Georgia statutes. TITLE 18 Debtor and Creditor
Article 4 Uniform Voidable Transactions Act

Cross references.

Provision that plaintiff may state claim for money and claim to set aside fraudulent conveyance without first obtaining judgment establishing claim for money, §

9-11-18

.

Form of complaint on claim for debt and to set aside fraudulent conveyance, §

9-11-113

.

Rights of unsecured creditors of seller of goods which have been identified to contract for sale, §

11-2-402

.

Attack by creditors on transactions between husband and wife, §

19-3-10

.

Gifts void as against creditors and bona fide purchasers,
§

44-5-88

.

Wrongful sale or removal of mortgaged property, §

44-14-6

.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 996, § 1-1/SB 65, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “(a)
This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Debtor-Creditor Uniform Law Modernization Act of 2015.’

“(b)
To promote consistency among the states, it is the intent of the General Assembly to modernize certain existing uniform laws promulgated by the Uniform Law Commission affecting debtor and creditor rights, responsibilities, and relationships and other federally recognized laws affecting such rights, responsibilities, and relationships.”

Ga. L. 2015, p. 996, § 7-1(d)/SB 65, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “(d)
The amendments made by Parts 4A and 4B of this Act shall:

“(1) Apply to a transfer made or obligation incurred on or after July 1, 2015;

“(2) Not apply to a transfer made or obligation incurred before July 1, 2015;

“(3) Not apply to a right of action that has accrued before July 1, 2015; and

“(4)
For purposes of this subsection, a transfer is made and an obligation is incurred at the time provided in Code Section 18-7-76.”

Law reviews.

For comment on Downs v. Powell,

215 Ga. 62

,

108 S.E.2d 715

(1959), see 11 Mercer L. Rev. 241 (1959).

For note discussing fraudulent conveyances by debtors, see 12 Ga. L. Rev. 814 (1978).

For article surveying domestic relations law in 1984-85, see 37 Mercer L. Rev. 221 (1985).

For article, “Preparing the Georgia Farmer (or Other Small Entrepreneur) for Bankruptcy,” see 22 Ga. St. B.J. 186 (1986).

Parties and Pleadings

Third party to fraudulent conveyance as necessary party. —

Defrauded creditor may, in court of equity, have fraudulent transaction set aside; and, for this purpose, third party to the transaction would be a proper and necessary party. Harper v. Atlanta Milling Co.,

203 Ga. 608

,

48 S.E.2d 89

, 1948 Ga. LEXIS 391 (1948) (decided under former Code 1933, §§ 28-104 and 28-201).

Grantor and first taker of stock not indispensable parties. —

In a fraudulent conveyance action against the grantee of stock brought by a divorced wife who was awarded the stock in the divorce proceeding, the grantor, husband, and first taker, a corporation, were not indispensable parties since neither was necessary for a just adjudication of the merits of the action, and neither was required for complete relief. Halta v. Bailey,

219 Ga. App. 178

,

464 S.E.2d 614

, 1995 Ga. App. LEXIS 985 (1995), cert. denied, No. S96C0490, 1996 Ga. LEXIS 430 (Ga. Feb. 16, 1996) (decided under former §

18-2-22

).

Special pleadings to show fraud. —

In trial of statutory claim to land, it is not necessary to have special pleadings to show fraud. Mattox v. West,

194 Ga. 310

,

21 S.E.2d 428

, 1942 Ga. LEXIS 564 (1942) (decided under former Code 1933, § 28-201).

Plea failing to allege intent or notice. —

Plea to action of ejectment, to effect that a certain deed, constituting one link in plaintiff’s chain of title, was made in fraud of rights of creditors under whom defendants hold, and is fraudulent and void, but which did not allege intent to defraud or notice to grantee should, on motion, be stricken. Baird v. Evans,

58 Ga. 350

, 1877 Ga. LEXIS 105 (1877) (decided under former law).

Allegation that assignee of insolvent debtor had notice of debtor’s insolvency. —

In action to set aside as fraudulent an assignment or transfer of property alleged to have been made by insolvent debtor in trust or for benefit of one of the creditors, when a benefit was reserved to the debtor, the petition need not allege that the assignee or transferee had notice of the debtor’s insolvency at the time of transfer. McKenzie v. Thomas,

118 Ga. 728

,

45 S.E. 610

, 1903 Ga. LEXIS 668 (1903) (decided under former Civil Code 1895, § 2695).

Subsequent transferee of the debtor

who sought to set aside the original transfer on the grounds of fraud had no argument that the transfer was invalid as to the original transferee because its claim to the property was based on its purchase from the debtor, it was the debtor’s privy and stood in the debtor’s shoes in challenging the validity of the debtor’s contract with the original transferee. Thomas Mote Trucking, Inc. v. PCL Civil Constructors, Inc.,

246 Ga. App. 306

,

540 S.E.2d 261

, 2000 Ga. App. LEXIS 1218 (2000) (decided under former §

18-2-22

).

Identity of specific conveyance required. —

In a fraudulent conveyances claim asserted under former O.C.G.A. §

18-2-22

, the requirement that fraud be pled with particularity mandates that the claimant identify a specific conveyance with sufficient definiteness to advise the adversary of the conveyance which it must explain. Gwinnett Property v. G & H Montage,

215 Ga. App. 889

,

453 S.E.2d 52

, 1994 Ga. App. LEXIS 1381 (1994), cert. denied, No. S95C0615, 1995 Ga. LEXIS 416 (Ga. Mar. 17, 1995) (decided under former §

18-2-22

).

Petition stating cause of action authorizing injunctive relief. —

See Moncrief Furnace Co. v. Northwest Atlanta Bank,

193 Ga. 440

,

19 S.E.2d 155

, 1942 Ga. LEXIS 425 (1942) (decided under former law).

Setting aside transfer as fraudulent. —

Paragraph (3) of former O.C.G.A. §

18-2-22

was not available to the party seeking to set aside the transfer as fraudulent when the amended answer and pretrial order only tracked the language of paragraph (2) of former O.C.G.A. §

18-2-22

. Nelson v. United States, 821 F. Supp. 1496, 1993 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 2481 (M.D. Ga. 1993) (decided under former § 18-2-22).

18-2-70.
Short title.

This article, which was formerly known and cited as the “Uniform Fraudulent Transfers Act,” shall be known and may be cited as the “Uniform Voidable Transactions Act.”

History.

Code 1981, §

18-2-70

, enacted by Ga. L. 2002, p. 141, § 3; Ga. L. 2015, p. 996, § 4A-1/SB 65.

Law reviews.

For survey article on cases in the areas of corporate, securities, partnership, and banking law for the period from June 1, 2002 through May 31, 2003, see 55 Mercer L. Rev. 55 (2003).

For annual survey of law on business associations, see 62 Mercer L. Rev. 41 (2010).

For annual survey on real property, see 69 Mercer L. Rev. 251 (2017).

For article, “Self-Settled Asset Protection Trusts in Georgia,” see 23 Ga. St. B.J. 17 (Feb. 2018).

For annual survey on business associations, see 70 Mercer L. Rev. 19 (2018).

For annual survey on real property law, see 70 Mercer L. Rev. 209 (2018).

18-2-71.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Affiliate” means:

A person who directly or indirectly owns, controls, or holds with power to vote, 20 percent or more of the outstanding voting securities of the debtor, other than a person who holds the securities:

As a fiduciary or agent without sole discretionary power to vote the securities; or

Solely to secure a debt, if the person has not exercised the power to vote;

A corporation 20 percent or more of whose outstanding voting securities are directly or indirectly owned, controlled, or held with power to vote by the debtor or a person who directly or indirectly owns, controls, or holds with power to vote 20 percent or more of the outstanding voting securities of the debtor, other than a person who holds the securities:

As a fiduciary or agent without sole power to vote the securities; or

Solely to secure a debt, if the person has not in fact exercised the power to vote;

A person whose business is operated by the debtor under a lease or other agreement, or a person substantially all of whose assets are controlled by the debtor; or

A person who operates the debtor’s business under a lease or other agreement or controls substantially all of the debtor’s assets.

“Asset” means property of a debtor, but the term does not include:

Property to the extent it is encumbered by a valid lien;

Property to the extent it is generally exempt under nonbankruptcy law; or

An interest in property held in tenancy by the entireties to the extent it is not subject to process by a creditor holding a claim against only one tenant.

“Claim,” except for claim for relief, means a right to payment, whether or not the right is reduced to judgment, liquidated, unliquidated, fixed, contingent, matured, unmatured, disputed, undisputed, legal, equitable, secured, or unsecured.

“Creditor” means a person who has a claim, regardless of when the person acquired the claim, together with any successors or assigns.

“Debt” means liability on a claim.

“Debtor” means a person who is liable on a claim.

“Electronic” means relating to technology having electrical, digital, magnetic, wireless, optical, electromagnetic, or similar capabilities.

“Insider” includes:

If the debtor is an individual:

A relative of the debtor or of a general partner of the debtor;

A partnership in which the debtor is a general partner;

A general partner in a partnership described in division (ii) of this subparagraph; or

A corporation of which the debtor is a director, officer, or person in control;

If the debtor is a corporation:

A director of the debtor;

An officer of the debtor;

A person in control of the debtor;

A partnership in which the debtor is a general partner;

A general partner in a partnership described in division (iv) of this subparagraph; or

A relative of a general partner, director, officer, or person in control of the debtor;

If the debtor is a partnership:

A general partner in the debtor;

A relative of a general partner in, or a general partner of, or a person in control of the debtor;

Another partnership in which the debtor is a general partner;

A general partner in a partnership described in division (iii) of this subparagraph; or

A person in control of the debtor;

An affiliate, or an insider of an affiliate as if the affiliate were the debtor; and

A managing agent of the debtor.

“Lien” means a charge against or an interest in property to secure payment of a debt or performance of an obligation and includes a security interest created by agreement, a judicial lien obtained by legal or equitable process or proceedings, a common-law lien, or a statutory lien.

“Organization” means a person other than an individual.

“Person” means an individual, public corporation, government or governmental subdivision agency or instrumentality, business or nonprofit entity, estate, or other legal entity.

“Property” means anything that may be the subject of ownership.

“Record” means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

“Relative” means an individual related by consanguinity within the third degree as determined by the common law, a spouse, or an individual related to a spouse within the third degree as so determined and includes an individual in an adoptive relationship within the third degree.

“Sign” means, with present intent to authenticate or adopt a record:

To execute or adopt a tangible symbol; or

To attach to or logically associate with the record an electronic symbol, sound, or process.

“Transfer” means every mode, direct or indirect, absolute or conditional, voluntary or involuntary, of disposing of or parting with an asset or an interest in an asset and includes payment of money, release, lease, and creation of a lien or other encumbrance.

“Valid lien” means a lien that is effective against the holder of a judicial lien subsequently obtained by legal or equitable process or proceedings.

History.

Code 1981, §

18-2-71

, enacted by Ga. L. 2002, p. 141, § 3; Ga. L. 2003, p. 140, § 18; Ga. L. 2015, p. 996, § 4A-1/SB 65.

Law reviews.

For article, “2014 Georgia Corporation and Business Organization Case Law Developments,” see 20 Ga. St. Bar. J. 26 (April 2015).

18-2-72.
Determining insolvency.

A debtor is insolvent if, at a fair valuation, the sum of the debtor’s debts is greater than the sum of the debtor’s assets.

A debtor who is generally not paying his or her debts as they become due other than as a result of a bona fide dispute is presumed to be insolvent. The presumption imposes on the party against which the presumption is directed the burden of proving that the nonexistence of insolvency is more probable than its existence.

Assets under this Code section do not include property that has been transferred, concealed, or removed with intent to hinder, delay, or defraud creditors or that has been transferred in a manner making the transfer voidable under this article.

Debts under this Code section do not include an obligation to the extent it is secured by a valid lien on property of the debtor not included as an asset.

History.

Code 1981, §

18-2-72

, enacted by Ga. L. 2002, p. 141, § 3; Ga. L. 2015, p. 996, § 4A-1/SB 65.

18-2-73.
Value given for transfer.

Value is given for a transfer or an obligation if, in exchange for the transfer or obligation, property is transferred or an antecedent debt is secured or satisfied, but value does not include an unperformed promise made otherwise than in the ordinary course of the promisor’s business to furnish support to the debtor or another person.

For the purposes of paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of Code Section 18-2-74 and Code Section 18-2-75, a person gives a reasonably equivalent value if the person acquires an interest of the debtor in an asset pursuant to a regularly conducted, noncollusive foreclosure sale or execution of a power of sale for the acquisition or disposition of the interest of the debtor upon default under a mortgage, deed of trust, or security agreement.

A transfer is made for present value if the exchange between the debtor and the transferee is intended by them to be contemporaneous and is in fact substantially contemporaneous.

History.

Code 1981, §

18-2-73

, enacted by Ga. L. 2002, p. 141, § 3; Ga. L. 2015, p. 996, § 4A-1/SB 65.

18-2-74.
Voidable transfer; determination of actual intent.

A transfer made or obligation incurred by a debtor is voidable as to a creditor, whether the creditor’s claim arose before or after the transfer was made or the obligation was incurred, if the debtor made the transfer or incurred the obligation:

With actual intent to hinder, delay, or defraud any creditor of the debtor; or

Without receiving a reasonably equivalent value in exchange for the transfer or obligation, and the debtor:

Was engaged or was about to engage in a business or a transaction for which the remaining assets of the debtor were unreasonably small in relation to the business or transaction; or

Intended to incur, or believed or reasonably should have believed that he or she would incur, debts beyond his or her ability to pay as they became due.

In determining actual intent under paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of this Code section, consideration may be given, among other factors, to whether:

The transfer or obligation was to an insider;

The debtor retained possession or control of the property transferred after the transfer;

The transfer or obligation was disclosed or concealed;

Before the transfer was made or obligation was incurred, the debtor had been sued or threatened with suit;

The transfer was of substantially all the debtor’s assets;

The debtor absconded;

The debtor removed or concealed assets;

The value of the consideration received by the debtor was reasonably equivalent to the value of the asset transferred or the amount of the obligation incurred;

The debtor was insolvent or became insolvent shortly after the transfer was made or the obligation was incurred;

The transfer occurred shortly before or shortly after a substantial debt was incurred; and

The debtor transferred the essential assets of the business to a lienor who transferred the assets to an insider of the debtor.

If a creditor is a successor or assignee, a right of action under subsection (a) of this Code section is automatically assigned to such successor or assignee.

A creditor making a claim for relief under subsection (a) of this Code section has the burden of proving the elements of the claim for relief by a preponderance of the evidence.

History.

Code 1981, §

18-2-74

, enacted by Ga. L. 2002, p. 141, § 3; Ga. L. 2015, p. 996, § 4A-1/SB 65.

Law reviews.

For article, “Self-Settled Asset Protection Trusts in Georgia,” see 23 Ga. St. B.J. 17 (Feb. 2018).

18-2-75.
Transfer or obligation voidable if incurred without receiving reasonably equivalent value.

A transfer made or obligation incurred by a debtor is voidable as to a creditor whose claim arose before the transfer was made or the obligation was incurred if the debtor made the transfer or incurred the obligation without receiving a reasonably equivalent value in exchange for the transfer or obligation and the debtor was insolvent at that time or the debtor became insolvent as a result of the transfer or obligation.

A transfer made by a debtor is voidable as to a creditor whose claim arose before the transfer was made if the transfer was made to an insider for an antecedent debt, the debtor was insolvent at that time, and the insider had reasonable cause to believe that the debtor was insolvent.

If a creditor is a successor or assignee, a right of action under subsection (a) or (b) of this Code section is automatically assigned to such successor or assignee.

Subject to subsection (b) of Code Section 18-2-72, a creditor making a claim for relief under subsection (a) or (b) of this Code section has the burden of proving the elements of the claim for relief by a preponderance of the evidence.

History.

Code 1981, §

18-2-75

, enacted by Ga. L. 2002, p. 141, § 3; Ga. L. 2015, p. 996, § 4A-1/SB 65.

18-2-76.
When transfer made.

For the purposes of this article:

A transfer is made:

With respect to an asset that is real property other than a fixture, but including the interest of a seller or purchaser under a contract for the sale of the asset, when the transfer is so far perfected that a good faith purchaser of the asset from the debtor against whom applicable law permits the transfer to be perfected cannot acquire an interest in the asset that is superior to the interest of the transferee; and

With respect to an asset that is not real property or that is a fixture, when the transfer is so far perfected that a creditor on a simple contract cannot acquire a judicial lien otherwise than under this article that is superior to the interest of the transferee;

If applicable law permits the transfer to be perfected as provided in paragraph (1) of this Code section and the transfer is not so perfected before the commencement of an action for relief under this article, the transfer is deemed made immediately before the commencement of the action;

If applicable law does not permit the transfer to be perfected as provided in paragraph (1) of this Code section, the transfer is made when it becomes effective between the debtor and the transferee;

A transfer is not made until the debtor has acquired rights in the asset transferred; and

An obligation is incurred:

If oral, when it becomes effective between the parties; or

If evidenced by a record, when the record signed by the obligor is delivered to or for the benefit of the obligee.

History.

Code 1981, §

18-2-76

, enacted by Ga. L. 2002, p. 141, § 3; Ga. L. 2015, p. 996, § 4A-1/SB 65.

18-2-77.
Relief for creditor against fraudulent transfer or obligation.

In an action for relief against a transfer or obligation under this article, a creditor, subject to the limitations in Code Section 18-2-78, may obtain:

Avoidance of the transfer or obligation to the extent necessary to satisfy the creditor’s claim;

An attachment or other provisional remedy against the asset transferred or other property of the transferee in accordance with the procedure prescribed by Chapter 3 of this title; and

Subject to applicable principles of equity and in accordance with applicable rules of civil procedure:

An injunction against further disposition by the debtor or a transferee, or both, of the asset transferred or of other property;

Appointment of a receiver to take charge of the asset transferred or of other property of the transferee; or

Any other relief the circumstances may require.

If a creditor has obtained a judgment on a claim against the debtor, the creditor, if the court so orders, may levy execution on the asset transferred or its proceeds.

History.

Code 1981, §

18-2-77

, enacted by Ga. L. 2002, p. 141, § 3; Ga. L. 2015, p. 996, § 4A-1/SB 65.

Law reviews.

For annual survey on business associations, see 70 Mercer L. Rev. 19 (2018).

For annual survey on real property law, see 70 Mercer L. Rev. 209 (2018).

18-2-78.
Conditions for voidability of transfer or obligation; judgment.

A transfer or obligation is not voidable under paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of Code Section 18-2-74 against a person who took in good faith and for a reasonably equivalent value or against any subsequent transferee or obligee.

To the extent a transfer is avoidable in an action by a creditor under paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of Code Section 18-2-77, the following rules apply:

Except as otherwise provided in this Code section, the creditor may recover judgment for the value of the asset transferred, as adjusted under subsection (c) of this Code section, or the amount necessary to satisfy the creditor’s claim, whichever is less. The judgment may be entered against:

The first transferee of the asset or the person for whose benefit the transfer was made; or

An immediate or mediate transferee of the first transferee, other than:

A good faith transferee who took for value; or

An immediate or mediate good faith transferee of a person described in division (i) of this subparagraph.

Recovery pursuant to paragraph (1) of subsection (a) or subsection (b) of Code Section 18-2-77 of or from the asset transferred or its proceeds, by levy or otherwise, is available only against a person described in paragraph (1) of this subsection.

If the judgment under subsection (b) of this Code section is based upon the value of the asset transferred, the judgment must be for an amount equal to the value of the asset at the time of the transfer, subject to adjustment as the equities may require.

Notwithstanding voidability of a transfer or an obligation under this article, a good faith transferee or obligee is entitled, to the extent of the value given the debtor for the transfer or obligation, to:

A lien on or a right to retain any interest in the asset transferred;

Enforcement of any obligation incurred; or

A reduction in the amount of the liability on the judgment.

A transfer is not voidable under paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of Code Section 18-2-74 or Code Section 18-2-75 if the transfer results from:

Termination of a lease upon default by the debtor when the termination is pursuant to the lease and applicable law; or

Enforcement of a security interest in compliance with Article 9 of the Uniform Commercial Code, other than acceptance of collateral in full or partial satisfaction of the obligation it secures.

A transfer is not voidable under subsection (b) of Code Section 18-2-75:

To the extent the insider gave new value to or for the benefit of the debtor after the transfer was made unless the new value was secured by a valid lien;

If made in the ordinary course of business or financial affairs of the debtor and the insider; or

If made pursuant to a good faith effort to rehabilitate the debtor and the transfer secured the present value given for that purpose as well as an antecedent debt of the debtor.

The following rules determine the burden of proving matters referred to in this Code section:

A party that seeks to invoke subsection (a), (d), (e), or (f) of this Code section has the burden of proving the applicability of that subsection;

Except as otherwise provided in paragraphs (3) and (4) of this subsection, the creditor has the burden of proving each applicable element of subsection (b) or (c) of this Code section;

The transferee has the burden of proving the applicability to the transferee of subparagraph (b) (1) (B) of this Code section; and

A party that seeks adjustment under subsection (c) of this Code section has the burden of proving the adjustment.

The standard of proof required to establish matters referred to in this Code section is preponderance of the evidence.

History.

Code 1981, §

18-2-78

, enacted by Ga. L. 2002, p. 141, § 3; Ga. L. 2015, p. 996, § 4A-1/SB 65.

Cross references.

Power of person possessing voidable title to transfer goods to good faith purchaser for value, §

11-2-403

.

Effect of sale to person without notice of equity, §

23-1-19

.

Law reviews.

For annual survey on business associations, see 70 Mercer L. Rev. 19 (2018).

For annual survey on real property law, see 70 Mercer L. Rev. 209 (2018).

18-2-79.
Time for commencement of action.

A cause of action with respect to a fraudulent transfer or obligation under this article is extinguished unless action is brought:

Under paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of Code Section 18-2-74, within four years after the transfer was made or the obligation was incurred or, if later, within one year after the transfer or obligation was or could reasonably have been discovered by the claimant;

Under paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of Code Section 18-2-74 or subsection (a) of Code Section 18-2-75, within four years after the transfer was made or the obligation was incurred; or

Under subsection (b) of Code Section 18-2-75, within one year after the transfer was made or the obligation was incurred.

History.

Code 1981, §

18-2-79

, enacted by Ga. L. 2002, p. 141, § 3; Ga. L. 2015, p. 996, § 4A-1/SB 65.

18-2-80.
Venue.

In this Code section, the following rules determine a debtor’s location:

A debtor who is an individual is located at the individual’s principal residence;

A debtor that is an organization and has only one place of business is located at its place of business; and

A debtor that is an organization and has more than one place of business is located at its chief executive office.

A cause of action in the nature of a claim for relief under this article is governed by the law of the jurisdiction in which the debtor is located when the transfer is made or the obligation is incurred.

History.

Code 1981, §

18-2-80

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 996, § 4A-1/SB 65.

18-2-81.
Series organization and determinations.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Protected series” means an arrangement, however denominated, created by a series organization that, pursuant to the law under which the series organization is organized, has the characteristics set forth in paragraph (2) of this subsection.

“Series organization” means an organization that, pursuant to the law under which it is organized, has the following characteristics:

The organic record of the organization provides for creation by the organization of one or more protected series, however denominated, with respect to specified property of the organization, and for records to be maintained for each protected series that identify the property of or associated with the protected series;

Debt incurred or existing with respect to the activities of, or property of or associated with, a particular protected series is enforceable against the property of or associated with the protected series only, and not against the property of or associated with the organization or other protected series of the organization; or

Debt incurred or existing with respect to the activities or property of the organization is enforceable against the property of the organization only, and not against the property of or associated with a protected series of the organization.

A series organization and each protected series of the organization is a separate person for purposes of this article, even if for other purposes a protected series is not a person separate from the organization or other protected series of the organization.

History.

Code 1981, §

18-2-81

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 996, § 4A-1/SB 65.

18-2-82.
Applicability of principles of law and equity.

Unless displaced by the provisions of this article, the principles of law and equity, including the law merchant and the law relating to principal and agent, estoppel, laches, fraud, misrepresentation, duress, coercion, mistake, insolvency, or other validating or invalidating cause, supplement its provisions.

History.

Code 1981, §

18-2-80

, enacted by Ga. L. 2002, p. 141, § 3; Code 1981, §

18-2-82

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2015, p. 996, § 4A-1/SB 65.

18-2-83.
Uniformity with laws of other states.

This article shall be applied and construed to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law with respect to the subject of this article among states enacting the “Uniform Voidable Transactions Act.”

History.

Code 1981, §

18-2-83

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 996, § 4A-1/SB 65.

18-2-84.
Construction with federal provisions.

This article modifies, limits, and supersedes the federal Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, 15 U.S.C. Section 7001, et seq., but shall not modify, limit, or supersede Section 101(c) of that act, 15 U.S.C. Section 7001(c), or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in Section 103(b) of that act, 15 U.S.C. Section 7003(b).

History.

Code 1981, §

18-2-84

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 996, § 4A-1/SB 65.

18-2-85.
Transfers to charitable organizations; statute of limitations.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Charitable organization” means an organization which has qualified as tax-exempt under Section 501(c) (3) of the federal Internal Revenue Code of 1986 and has been so qualified for not less than two years preceding any transfer pursuant to this Code section, other than a private foundation or family trust.

“Private foundation” shall have the same meaning as set forth in 26 U.S.C. Section 509(a).

A transfer made to a charitable organization shall be considered voidable only if it is established that a voidable transfer has occurred as described in Code Section 18-2-74 or 18-2-75, and such charitable organization had actual or constructive knowledge of the voidable nature of the transfer.

The statute of limitations for a civil action with respect to a voidable transfer to a charitable organization under this Code section shall be within two years after such transfer was made.

History.

Code 1981, §

18-2-81

, enacted by Ga. L. 2013, p. 1045, § 1/SB 105; Code 1981, §

18-2-85

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2015, p. 996, § 4A-1/SB 65.